Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5020.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 33 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
The commander-in-chief shall not assist, facilitate, communicate or allow
communications between the United States Department of Defense or any branch thereof and
individual service members or units of the national guard on any matter associated with an
individual or unit being called into active service under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code
unless the active service is:
(i) in support of a congressionally authorized military contingency;
(ii) in support of operations in response to a national catastrophe or disaster as declared in
a formal declaration of war, congressional authorization for the use of military force or
presidential declaration;
of 2

(iii) in support of a congressionally authorized mission with the United States Department
of Homeland Security that is consistent with federal law on the appropriate use of the Armed
Forces of the United States within or without the continental United States;
(iv) for training for duties that are part of the primary duties of the individual or unit;
(v) for military support of the civil authorities of another state or territory with the
express permission of the state’s or territory’s governor or executive civil authority; or
(vi) for military support of civil authorities for other duties supported by congressional
action, federal law or tradition, except not law enforcement or immigration enforcement duties
other than indirect support or surveillance duties that are part of a border security operation.
Notwithstanding the second paragraph, the commander-in-chief shall not allow an
individual or unit of the national guard to be called into active service under Title 10 or 32 of the
United States Code if allowing the call into active service would result in the national guard
being effectively incapable of responding to a statewide emergency, such as a natural disaster or
terrorism event.
of 2